Illinois, session 104th, SB4094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 1 5OPERATIONAL EXPENSES 6    Section 5. In addition to other amounts appropriated, the 7amount of $17,107,000, or so much thereof as may be necessary, 8respectively, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 10operational expenses, awards, grants and permanent 11improvements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, 12including prior years' costs. 13    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:16GENERAL ADMINISTRATION17OPERATIONS18Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 19  For ordinary and contingent expenses associated20   with general administration, grants and 21   including prior years' costs....................10,000,00022Payable from the Intra-Agency Services Fund:   SB4094- 2 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  For overhead costs related to federal2   programs, including prior years' costs......... 18,689,2003Payable from the Build Illinois Bond Fund: 4  For ordinary and contingent expenses associated5   with the administration of the capital program,6   including prior years' costs.....................5,000,0007Payable from the General Revenue Fund:8  For ordinary and contingent expenses9   associated with general administration and10   operational expenses...............................500,00011  For ordinary and contingent expenses12   associated with port district 13   development and planning...........................250,000 14    Section 15. The sum of $5,775,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 16Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the General Revenue 17Fund for the ordinary and contingent expenses associated with 18the Office of Grants Management, including prior years' costs. 19    Section 20. The sum of $76,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 21Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the Cannabis Business 22Development Fund for administrative costs, awards, loans and 23grants Pursuant to Section 7-10 and Section 7-15 of the 24Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.   SB4094- 3 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 25. The sum of $2,060,100, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 3Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the Cannabis Regulation 4Fund for administrative costs, awards and grants for technical 5assistance pursuant to the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act. 6    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:9OFFICE OF TOURISM10OPERATIONS11Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 12  For administrative expenses and grants13   for the tourism program, including14   prior years' costs...............................5,110,20015Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund:16  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses17   associated with outdoor recreation, including18   prior years' costs...............................2,500,00019  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses 20   associated with advertising and promoting Illinois 21   Tourism in domestic and international 22   markets, including prior years' costs...........44,000,00023    Total                                         $51,610,200   SB4094- 4 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:4OFFICE OF TOURISM5GRANTS6Payable from the International Tourism Fund: 7  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative8   Expenses Associated with the International9   Tourism Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-707,10   including prior years' costs.....................4,000,00011Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 12  For the Tourism Attraction Development 13   Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8a.........1,800,00014  For Purposes Pursuant to the Illinois 15   Promotion Act, 20 ILCS 665/4a-1 to 16   Match Funds from Sources in the17   Private Sector.....................................600,00018  For the Tourism Matching Grant Program 19   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for 20   Counties under 1,000,000.........................1,250,00021  For the Tourism Matching Grant Program 22   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for 23   Counties over 1,000,000............................750,00024    Total                                          $4,400,00025Payable from Local Tourism Fund: 26  For Choose Chicago................................3,967,244  SB4094- 5 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  For grants to Convention and Tourism Bureaus2   Bureaus Outside of Chicago......................18,073,0003  For grants, contracts, and administrative 4   expenses associated with the 5   Local Tourism and Convention Bureau 6   Program pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-705, 7   including prior years' costs.......................550,0008    Total                                         $22,590,244 9The Department, with the consent in writing from the Governor, 10may reapportion not more than ten percent of the total 11appropriation of Tourism Promotion Fund, in Section 35, among 12the various purposes therein recommended. 13    Section 40. The sum of $1,940,514, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 15business on June 30, 2026, from appropriations heretofore made 16for such purpose in Article 45, Section 35 and Article 45, 17Section 36 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 18reappropriated from the Tourism Promotion Fund to the 19Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 20Tourism Attraction Development Grant Program Pursuant to 20 21ILCS 665/8a. 22    Section 45. The sum of $600,568, or so much thereof as may 23be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business   SB4094- 6 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1on June 30, 2026, from appropriations heretofore made for such 2purpose in Article 45, Section 35 and Article 45, Section 37 of 3Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the 4Tourism Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and 5Economic Opportunity for Purposes Pursuant to the Illinois 6Promotion Act, 20 ILCS 665/4a-1 to Match Funds from Sources in 7the Private Sector. 8    Section 50. The sum of $1,439,922, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from appropriations heretofore made 11of such purpose in Article 45, Section 35 and Article 45, 12Section 38 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 13reappropriated from the Tourism Promotion Fund to the 14Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 15Tourism Matching Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for 16Counties under 1,000,000. 17    Section 55. The sum of $848,537, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 19on June 30, 2026, from appropriations heretofore made of such 20purpose in Article 45, Section 35 and Article 45, Section 39 of 21Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the 22Tourism Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and 23Economic Opportunity for the Tourism Matching Grant Program 24Pursuant to 20 ILCS 665/8-1 for Counties over 1,000,000.   SB4094- 7 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 60. The sum of $3,839,596, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 3business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 4made for such purpose in Article 45, Section 40 of Public Act 5104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Tourism 6Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity For grants and awards pursuant to 20 ILCS 665, 8including prior year costs. 9    Section 65. The sum of $8,678,299, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 12made for such purpose in Article 45, Section 45 of Public Act 13104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Tourism 14Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity For a tourism incentives grant program pursuant to 1620 ILCS 665/8a. 17    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:20OFFICE OF EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING21GRANTS22Payable from the General Revenue Fund: 23  For the purpose of Grants, Contracts, and  SB4094- 8 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   Administrative Expenses associated with DCEO2   Job Training and Workforce Programs, 3   including prior years' costs....................3,000,000 4Payable from the Federal Workforce Training Fund: 5  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 6   Expenses Associated with the Workforce 7   Innovation and Opportunity Act and other 8   Workforce training programs, including refunds 9   and prior years' costs.........................325,000,00010Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For grants, contracts, and administrative expenses12   to support workforce services provided in coordination13   with Illinois Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act14   Title 1B Programs for Local Workforce Innovation Areas15   requiring supplemental support, as determined16   by the department, utilizing a needs-based assessment,17   including prior years' costs.....................5,000,00018  For a grant to the Illinois Manufacturing19   Excellence Center for expenses associated20   with a Made in Illinois Grant Program,21   including prior years' costs.....................1,000,000 22    Section 75. The following named amounts, or so much 23thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 24the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:25OFFICE OF ENTREPRENEURSHIP, INNOVATION AND TECHNOLOGY  SB4094- 9 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1GRANTS2Payable from the General Revenue Fund:3  For grants, contracts, and administrative4   expenses associated with the Illinois5   Office of Entrepreneurship, Innovation6   and Technology, including prior years' costs.....3,335,0007Payable from the General Revenue Fund:8  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative9   Expenses Associated with the Illinois10   SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program11   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-1055.................6,500,00012  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative Expenses13   Associated with the Innovation Vouchers Program14   Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-1060.................3,000,00015  For a grant to the Illinois Manufacturing Excellence16   Center to support statewide retention and17   expansion of small and mid-sized manufacturers 18   in Illinois, for costs associated with federal 19   award matching, technical assistance, job training,20   and related services, including prior21   years' costs.....................................1,800,00022  For grants, contracts, and administrative23   expenses associated with DCEO 24   Technology Projects and Programs, including25   prior years' costs...............................7,500,00026    Total                                         $22,135,000  SB4094- 10 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Payable from the Clean Air 2 Act Permit Fund: 3  For grants and administrative expenses of the 4   Small Business Environmental Assistance Program,5   including prior years' costs.......................525,0006Payable from the Workforce, Technology,  7 and Economic Development Fund: 8  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 9   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/ 10   605-420, including prior years' costs...........10,250,00011Payable from the Commerce and 12 Community Affairs Assistance Fund:13  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative14   expenses of the APEX Accelerators Program,15   including prior years' costs.....................1,500,00016  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 17   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/18   605-500, including prior years' costs...........10,000,00019  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 20   Expenses Pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-30,21   including prior years' costs ...................70,000,00022Payable from the State Small Business  23 Credit Initiative Fund:24  For the Purpose of Contracts, Grants, Loans, Investments25   and Administrative Expenses in Accordance with the26   State Small Business Credit Initiative Program,  SB4094- 11 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   and other business development programs,2   including refunds and prior years' costs.......312,000,0003    Total                                       $404,275,000  4    Section 80. The sum of $38,073,491, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2026, from reappropriations heretofore 7made for such purpose in Article 45, Section 60 and Article 45, 8Section 205 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 9reappropriated from the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 10Development Fund for Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 11Expenses Associated with Leveraging Federal Awards and 12Opportunities, including prior year costs. 13    Section 85. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:16OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT17OPERATIONS18Payable from South Suburban 19 Brownfields Redevelopment Fund:20  For grants, contracts and administrative21   expenses of the South Suburban 22   Brownfields Redevelopment Program................4,000,00023Payable from Economic Research and 24 Information Fund:  SB4094- 12 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  For Purposes Set Forth in Section 605-202   of the Civil Administrative Code of3   Illinois (20 ILCS 605/605-20)......................150,000 4    Section 90. The sum of $9,147,037, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 7made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 70 of Public Act 8104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Economic 9Research and Information Fund to the Department of Commerce 10and Economic Opportunity For grants, contracts, and 11administrative expenses associated with 20 ILCS 605/605-1007 12and the development, research, and implementation of IT 13solutions to improve access to information and streamline 14common processes for Illinois businesses including prior year 15costs. 16    Section 95. The sum of $51,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 18business on June 30, 2026, from reappropriations heretofore 19made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 75 and Article 2045, Section 225 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 21reappropriated from the Workforce, Technology, and Economic 22Development Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity for all costs and expenses associated with the 24Employer Training Investment Program and other business   SB4094- 13 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1retention and attraction activities, including prior year 2costs. 3    Section 100. The sum of $3,350,697, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 5business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 6made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 80 of Public Act 7104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 8Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 9Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, contracts, and 10administrative expenses associated with Office of Minority 11Economic Empowerment small business support efforts, including 12prior year costs. 13    Section 105. The sum of $260,269, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 15on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 16such purposes in Article 45, Section 85 of Public Act 17104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 18Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses 20associated with a marketing campaign to promote manufacturing, 21technology, and innovation in Illinois and increase the number 22of people entering high-demand manufacturing and technology 23occupations, including prior year costs. This may include 24costs and expenses associated with research to support   SB4094- 14 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1marketing campaign efforts. The expenditures shall be at the 2approximate amounts below:3  For a marketing campaign to increase the4   number of people entering electric5   vehicle and electric vehicle component6   manufacturing occupations........................2,000,000 7    Section 110. The sum of $14,815,263, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 9business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 10made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 90 of Public Act 11104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 12Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 13Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants and all ordinary 14and contingent expenses related to economic development and 15business attraction and retention purposes. 16    Section 115. The sum of $9,450,561, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 18business on June 30, 2026 from an appropriation heretofore 19made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 100 of Public Act 20104-0003 as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 21Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, contracts, and 23contingent costs associated with Clean Energy and EV Career 24and Technical Education Pilot Program.   SB4094- 15 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 120. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:4OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT GRANTS5Payable from the General Revenue Fund: 6  For a grant associated with Job training, research7   and other operational expenses8   to the Chicago Federation of Labor 9   Workforce and Community Initiative,10   including prior years' costs.....................2,700,00011  For a grant associated with Job training12   to the Chicagoland Regional College Program,13   including prior years' costs.....................1,800,00014  For a grant to HACIA for costs15   associated with the development and16   execution of job training and other 17   operational expenses.............................2,880,00018  For a grant associated with job training19   to Richland Community College....................1,350,00020  For a grant associated with Job Training to the 21   Illinois Manufacturers' Association, including 22   prior years' costs...............................1,319,70023  For a grant to the Chicagoland Chamber24   of Commerce for all costs associated25   with job training................................1,350,000  SB4094- 16 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  For a grant to the Joliet Arsenal 2   Development Authority, including prior3   years' costs.......................................720,0004  For a grant associated with the Workforce5   Hub Program to HIRE360...........................2,009,9006  For a grant associated with operational7   expenses to the Illinois Black American 8   Chambers of Commerce Inc.........................1,350,0009  For a grant to the Metro East Business10   Incubator Inc., including 11   prior years' costs.................................135,00012  For grants and contingent costs13   associated with business development14   including prior years' costs.....................1,956,30015Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For deposit into the DCEO Projects Fund17   for Grants, Contracts, and Administrative18   expenses, including technical and financial19   assistance for qualifying entities, 20   for costs associated with reducing food  21  insecurity in urban and rural areas 22  throughout Illinois ..............................2,000,00023Payable from the General Revenue Fund:24  For grants, contracts, and administrative costs25   associated with expanding accessibility26   of workforce development opportunities in  SB4094- 17 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   rural communities throughout the state2   and for rural economic development, including3   prior years' costs...............................1,500,0004Payable from the Illinois Capital  5 Revolving Loan Fund:6  For the Purpose of Contracts, Grants,7   Loans, Investments and Administrative8   Expenses in Accordance with the Provisions9   Of the Small Business Development Act10   Pursuant to 30 ILCS 750/9, including11   prior years' costs...............................2,000,00012Payable from the Illinois Equity Fund:13  For the purpose of Grants, Loans, and14   Investments in Accordance with the15   Provisions of the Small Business16   Development Act..................................1,900,00017Payable from the Large Business Attraction Fund:18  For the purpose of Grants, Loans,19   Investments, and Administrative 20   Expenses in Accordance with Article21   10 of the Build Illinois Act.......................500,00022  For grants, contracts, and administrative23   expenses in Accordance with the Invest24   in Illinois Program Act, including25   prior years' costs.............................500,000,00026Payable from the Public Infrastructure   SB4094- 18 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1 Construction Loan Revolving Fund:2  For the Purpose of Grants, Loans,3   Investments, and Administrative4   Expenses in Accordance with Article 85   of the Build Illinois Act........................1,000,000 6    Section 125. The amount of $7,110,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, appropriated from the General Revenue 8Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9for administrative costs and grants to the following named 10entities for all costs associated with economic development. 11The combined cost of grants and administrative expenses 12associated with each grant shall equal the approximate amounts 13below:14  Illinois Business and Economic Development Corporation15   dba- "Intersect Illinois" development............5,760,00016  World Business Chicago............................1,350,000 17    Section 130. The named amounts, or so much thereof that 18remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 19from reappropriations heretofore made for such purpose in 20Article 45, Section 110 and Article 45, Section 240 of Public 21Act 104-0003, as amended, is hereby reappropriated from the 22DCEO Projects Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity including prior years' costs:24  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative expenses,   SB4094- 19 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   including technical & financial assistance for 2   qualifying entities, for costs associated with 3   reducing food insecurity in urban and rural 4   areas throughout Illinois ......................28,398,621 5    Section 135. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:8ILLINOIS FILM OFFICE9Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 10  For administrative expenses, grants, 11   and contracts associated with 12   advertising and promotion, including13   prior years' costs...............................2,261,30014Payable from the General Revenue Fund:15  For a grant to Whiteside County for all costs16   Associated with for the development of 17   the Northwest Illinois Film Office..................31,50018Payable from the Illinois Production  19 Workforce Development Fund:20  For grants for workforce training Programs21   pursuant to 35 ILCS 16/46........................1,000,000 22    Section 140. The following named amounts, or so much 23thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 24Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:  SB4094- 20 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1OFFICE OF TRADE AND INVESTMENT2OPERATIONS3Payable from the International Tourism Fund: 4  For Grants, Contracts, and Administrative 5   Expenses associated with the Illinois Office 6   of Trade and Investment, including 7   prior years' costs...............................1,575,0008Payable from the International and Promotional Fund: 9  For Grants, Contracts, Administrative 10   Expenses, and Refunds Pursuant to 11   20 ILCS 605/605-25, including 12   prior years' costs.................................300,00013Payable from the Tourism Promotion Fund: 14  For grants, contracts, and administrative 15   expenses associated with the Illinois Office 16   of Trade and Investment, including 17   prior years' costs...............................4,616,900 18    Section 145. The following named amounts, or so much 19thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:21OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AND ENERGY ASSISTANCE22GRANTS23Payable from the Water and Sewer Low-Income 24 Assistance Fund:25  For purposes of administrative costs, grants,  SB4094- 21 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   and financial assistance pursuant2   to the Water and Sewer Financial Assistance3   Act Pursuant to 305 ILCS 21......................5,000,0004Payable from Supplemental Low-Income Energy  5 Assistance Fund: 6  For Grants and Administrative Expenses 7   Pursuant to Section 13 of the Energy 8   Assistance Act of 1989, as Amended, 9   including refunds and prior years' costs.......299,750,00010Payable from Energy Administration Fund: 11  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 12   Expenses associated with DCEO Weatherization13   Programs, including refunds and prior14   years' costs...................................328,000,00015Payable from Low Income Home Energy  16 Assistance Block Grant Fund: 17  For Grants, Contracts and Administrative 18   Expenses associated with the Low-Income Home19   Energy Assistance Act of 1981, including 20   refunds and prior years' costs.................400,000,00021Payable from the Community Services Block Grant Fund: 22  For Administrative Expenses and Grants to23   Eligible Recipients as Defined in the24   Community Services Block Grant Act, including25   refunds and prior years' costs..................75,000,000   SB4094- 22 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 150. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, respectively are appropriated to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:4OFFICE OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT5Payable from the Community Development/Small 6 Cities Block Grant Fund:7  For Grants to Local Units of Government 8   or Other Eligible Recipients and for contracts 9   and administrative expenses, as Defined in 10   the Community Development Act of 1974, or by 11   U.S. HUD Notice approving Supplemental allocation12   For the Illinois CDBG Program, including refunds 13   and prior years' costs...................................014  For Administrative and Grant Expenses Relating15   to Training, Technical Assistance and 16   Administration of the Community Development 17   Assistance Programs, and for Grants to Local 18   Units of Government or Other Eligible19   Recipients as Defined in the Community 20   Development Act of 1974, as amended,21   for Illinois Cities with populations 22   under 50,000, including refunds 23   and prior years' costs.........................245,000,000 24    Section 155. The following named amounts, or so much 25thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to   SB4094- 23 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:2Payable from the General Revenue Fund:3  For a grant to the Northeast DuPage Special4   Recreation Association.............................220,0005  For a grant to the AllenForce-Veterans6   Initiative for assistance to veterans...............90,0007  For a grant to William Rainey Harper College8   for costs associated with the Education and 9   Work Center in Hanover Park........................572,40010  For a grant to the Veterans Assistance11   Commission of Will County for12   Programmatic expenses..............................117,00013  For a grant to the National14   Main Street Center, Inc. for costs associated15   with the Illinois Main Street Program..............400,00016Payable from the Agricultural Premium Fund:17  For a grant to the Rural Affairs18   Institute at Western Illinois University19   for Ordinary and Contingent Expenses...............160,000 20    Section 160. The following named amounts, or so much 21thereof as may be necessary, respectively are appropriated to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity:23OFFICE OF BROADBAND24Payable from the General Revenue Fund:25  For the ordinary and contingent expenses associated  SB4094- 24 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1   with the administration of the broadband program,2   including prior years' costs.....................1,249,5003Payable from the Digital Divide Elimination Fund:4  For grants, contingent expenses,5   and prior years' costs associated6   with the Broadband Deployment Program's7   Digital Literacy, Adoption and Equity Program......500,0008Payable from the Commerce and 9 Community Affairs Assistance Fund:10  For grants, contingent expenses,11   and expenditures for Federal broadband12   awards, including prior years' costs............10,000,000 13    Section 165. The sum of $7,500,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Works Fund 15to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 16ordinary and contingent expenses associated with the Illinois 17Works Jobs Program Act 30 ILCS 559/20, including prior years' 18costs. 19    Section 170. The sum of $360,000, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 22purposes of operating assistance to the City of East St. 23Louis.   SB4094- 25 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 175. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much therefore 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Tourism 3Promotion Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 4Opportunity for grants to certified convention bureaus for the 5development of tourism, education, preservation, and promotion 6of the 100th anniversary of Route 66. 7    Section 180. The sum of $350,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Energy 9Transition Assistance Fund to the Department of Commerce and 10Economic Opportunity for operational expenses, grants, 11contracts and expenditures pursuant to the Energy Transition 12Act, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 185. The sum of $28,050,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Coal to Solar and 15Energy Storage Initiative Fund to the Department of Commerce 16and Economic Opportunity for operational expenses, grants, 17contracts and expenditures pursuant to the Energy Transition 18Act. 19    Section 190. The sum of $10,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 21Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the Loan Loss Reserve 22Fund for all costs associated with the DCEO Loan Guarantee 23Program, including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 26 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 195. The sum of $50,000,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Workforce, 3Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 4Commerce and Economic Opportunity for Grants, Contracts, and 5Administrative Expenses Associated with Customized Training, 6Recruitment, and Business Development Efforts. 7    Section 200. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10for Grants to Illinois Retail Merchants Association for all 11costs associated with the promotion, workforce development, 12and training. 13    Section 205. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 15on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made for 16such purposes in Article 45, Section 215 of Public Act 17104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Workforce, 18Technology, and Economic Development Fund to the Department of 19Commerce and Economic Opportunity for all costs and expenses 20associated with a marketing campaign to promote manufacturing, 21technology, and innovation in Illinois and increase the number 22of people entering high-demand manufacturing and technology 23occupations, including prior year costs. This may include   SB4094- 27 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1costs and expenses associated with research to support 2marketing campaign efforts. 3    Section 206. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the DCEO Projects Fund 5to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 6Grants, Contracts, and Administrative expenses, including 7technical & financial assistance for qualifying entities, for 8costs associated with reducing food insecurity in urban and 9rural areas throughout Illinois. 10    Section 210. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 12business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 13made for such purposes in Article 45, Section 245 of Public Act 14104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated to the Department of 15Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the DCEO Projects Fund 16for a grant to the Illinois Retail Merchants Association for 17costs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-70, including prior years' 18costs. 19    Section 215. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 21Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the DCEO Projects Fund 22for a grant to the Illinois Retail Merchants Association for 23costs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-70, including prior years'   SB4094- 28 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1costs. 2    Section 220. The amount of $5,000,000, that was 3appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 4of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to NASCAR 5events and Entertainment LLC for costs associated with 6operating expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 7Section 250 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 8thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 9June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 10Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity for a grant to NASCAR events and Entertainment LLC 12for costs associated with operating expenses. 13    Section 225. The amount of $750,000, that was appropriated 14from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 15and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Greater Roseland 16Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 17operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 18Section 255 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 19thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 20June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 21Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 22Opportunity for a grant to the Greater Roseland Chamber of 23Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 24including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 29 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 230. The amount of $750,000, that was appropriated 2from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 3and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Washington Park 4Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 5operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 6Section 260 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 7thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 8June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 9Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity for a grant to the Washington Park Chamber of 11Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 12including prior years' costs. 13    Section 235. The amount of $75,000, that was appropriated 14from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 15and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the South Asian 16American Policy and Research Institute for costs associated 17with contingent and operational expenses in State fiscal year 182026 by Article 45, Section 265 of Public Act 104-0003, as 19amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 20close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 21from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the South 23Asian American Policy and Research Institute for costs 24associated with operational expenses, including prior years'   SB4094- 30 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1costs. 2    Section 240. The amount of $1,000,000, that was 3appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 4of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Rosalind 5Franklin University of Medicine and Science for costs 6associated with the Community Care Connection (CCC) Mobile 7Health Program in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 8Section 270 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 9thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 10June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 11Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity for a grant to Rosalind Franklin University of 13Medicine and Science for costs associated with the Community 14Care Connection (CCC) Mobile Health Program. 15    Section 245. The amount of $1,500,000, that was 16appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 17of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the 18Hispanic Chamber Commerce Of Illinois for costs associated 19with contingent and operational expenses in State fiscal year 202026 by Article 45, Section 275 of Public Act 104-0003, as 21amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 22close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 23from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of 24Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Hispanic   SB4094- 31 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Chamber of Commerce Of Illinois for costs associated with 2operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 3    Section 250. The amount of $2,000,000, that was 4appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 5of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Rainbow 6PUSH for costs associated with contingent and operational 7expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 280 8of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 9remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 10is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 12grant to Rainbow PUSH for costs associated with operational 13expenses, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 255. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 15from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 16and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Asian American 17Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with operational 18expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 285 19of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 20remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 21is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Asian American Chamber of Commerce for costs 24associated with operational expenses   SB4094- 32 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 260. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 2from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 3and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the South Asian 4American Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with 5contingent and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 6by Article 45, Section 290 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 7or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the 9Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and 10Economic Opportunity for a grant to the South Asian American 11Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with operational 12expenses, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 265. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 14from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 15and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Assyrian American 16Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 17operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 18Section 295 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 19thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 20June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 21Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 22Opportunity for a grant to the Assyrian American Chamber of 23Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 24including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 33 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 270. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 2from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 3and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Arab American Family 4Services for costs associated with contingent and operational 5expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 300 6of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 7remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 8is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 10grant to Arab American Family Services for costs associated 11with operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 275. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the SBDC of Aurora for 15costs associated with contingent and operational expenses in 16State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 305 of Public Act 17104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 18unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 19appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 21the SBDC of Aurora for costs associated with operational 22expenses, including prior years' costs. 23    Section 280. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated   SB4094- 34 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Joliet Latino 3Economic Development Association for costs associated with 4contingent and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 5by Article 45, Section 310 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 6or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the 8Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and 9Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Joliet Latino Economic 10Development Association for costs associated with operational 11expenses, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 285. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Little Village 15Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 16operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 17Section 315 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 18thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 19June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 20Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity for a grant to the Little Village Chamber of 22Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 23including prior years' costs. 24    Section 290. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated   SB4094- 35 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Roscoe Village 3Neighbors for costs associated with contingent and operational 4expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 320 5of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 6remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 7is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 9grant to Roscoe Village Neighbors for costs associated with 10operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 11    Section 295. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Hermosa Belmont Cragin 14Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 15operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 16Section 325 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 17thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 18June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 19Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity for a grant to Hermosa Belmont Cragin Chamber of 21Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 22including prior years' costs. 23    Section 300. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 24from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce   SB4094- 36 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Northwest 2Community Development Center for costs associated with 3contingent and operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 4by Article 45, Section 330 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 5or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the close of 6business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the 7Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and 8Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Northwest Community 9Development Center for costs associated with operational 10expenses, including prior years' costs. 11    Section 305. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Northwest Hispanic 14Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 15operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 16Section 335 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 17thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 18June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 19Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity for a grant to the Northwest Hispanic Chamber of 21Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 22including prior years' costs. 23    Section 310. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 24from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce   SB4094- 37 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and Economic Opportunity for a grant to The Southwest 2Collective for costs associated with contingent and 3operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 4Section 340 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 5thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 6June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 7Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity for a grant to The Southwest Collective for costs 9associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 10costs. 11    Section 315. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Midway Chamber of 14Commerce for costs associated with contingent and operational 15expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 345 16of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 17remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 18is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to the Midway Chamber of Commerce for costs associated 21with operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 22    Section 320. The amount of $200,000, that was appropriated 23from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 24and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Logan Square   SB4094- 38 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Chamber of Commerce for costs associated with contingent and 2operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, 3Section 350 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 4thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 5June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 6Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for a grant to the Logan Square Chamber of 8Commerce for costs associated with operational expenses, 9including prior years' costs. 10    Section 325. The sum of $1,000,000, that was appropriated 11from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 12and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Chicago Black 13Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for costs associated with public 14safety, economic development and administrative expenses in 15State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 355 of Public Act 16104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 17unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 18appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 19Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 20the Chicago Black Chamber of Commerce, Inc. for costs 21associated with public safety, economic development and 22administrative expenses. 23    Section 330. The sum of $1,000,000, that was appropriated 24from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce   SB4094- 39 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the PGA Tour 2Enterprises, LLC for costs associated with the operation of a 3tournament in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 4360 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 5remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 6is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to the PGA Tour Enterprises, LLC for costs associated 9with the operation of a tournament. 10    Section 335. The amount of $292,000, that was appropriated 11from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 12and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Schaumburg 13Convention Center for costs associated with public safety, 14economic development and administrative expenses in State 15fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 365 of Public Act 16104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 17unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 18appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 19Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 20the Schaumburg Convention Center for costs associated with 21public safety, economic development and administrative 22expenses. 23    Section 340. The amount of $500,000, that was appropriated 24from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce   SB4094- 40 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the League of Chicago 2Theaters for costs associated with public safety, economic 3development and administrative expenses in State fiscal year 42026 by Article 45, Section 370 of Public Act 104-0003, as 5amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 6close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 7from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of 8Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the League of 9Chicago Theaters for costs associated with public safety, 10economic development and administrative expenses. 11    Section 345. The amount of $709,500, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Forest Preserves 14of Cook County for costs associated with public safety, 15economic development and administrative expenses in State 16fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 375 of Public Act 17104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 18unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 19appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 21the Forest Preserves of Cook County for costs associated with 22public safety, economic development and administrative 23expenses. 24    Section 350. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated   SB4094- 41 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Glenwood Academy 3NOW Program for costs associated with public safety, economic 4development and administrative expenses in State fiscal year 52026 by Article 45, Section 380 of Public Act 104-0003, as 6amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 7close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 8from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of 9Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Glenwood 10Academy NOW Program for costs associated with public safety, 11economic development and administrative expenses. 12    Section 355. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Braven for costs 15associated with public safety, economic development and 16administrative expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 1745, Section 385 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 18thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 19June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 20Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity for a grant to Braven for costs associated with 22public safety, economic development and administrative 23expenses. 24    Section 360. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated   SB4094- 42 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity for a grant to One Goal for costs 3associated with public safety, economic development and 4administrative expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 545, Section 390 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 6thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 7June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 8Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity for a grant to One Goal for costs associated with 10public safety, economic development and administrative 11expenses. 12    Section 365. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for a grant to High Jump for costs 15associated with public safety, economic development and 16administrative expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 1745, Section 395 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 18thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 19June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 20Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity for a grant to High Jump for costs associated with 22public safety, economic development and administrative 23expenses. 24    Section 370. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated   SB4094- 43 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 2and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Loyola Univeristy for 3costs associated with public safety, economic development and 4administrative expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 545, Section 400 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 6thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 7June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 8Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 9Opportunity for a grant to Loyola Univeristy Chicago for costs 10associated with public safety, economic development and 11administrative expenses. 12    Section 375. The amount of $250,000, that was appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 14and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Mercy Housing 15Lakefront for costs associated with public safety, economic 16development and administrative expenses in State fiscal year 172026 by Article 45, Section 405 of Public Act 104-0003, as 18amended, or so much thereof that remains unexpended at the 19close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated 20from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of 21Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Mercy Housing 22Lakefront for costs associated with public safety, economic 23development and administrative expenses. 24    Section 380. The amount of $1,000,000, that was   SB4094- 44 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 2of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Route 66 3Centennial Commission for costs associated with operational 4expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 410 5of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 6remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 7is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 9grant to Route 66 Centennial Commission for costs associated 10with operational expenses. 11    Section 385. The amount of $450,000, that was appropriated 12from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 13and Economic Opportunity for a grant to the Magnificent Mile 14Association for costs associated with operational expenses in 15State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 415 of Public Act 16104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 17unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 18appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 19Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 20the Magnificent Mile Association for costs associated with 21operational expenses. 22    Section 390. The amount of $500,000, that was appropriated 23from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 24and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Illinois Grape Growers   SB4094- 45 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and Vintners Alliance for costs associated with operational 2expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 420 3of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that 4remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 5is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to Illinois Grape Growers and Vintners Alliance for 8costs associated with operational expenses. 9    Section 395. The amount of $100,000, that was appropriated 10from the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce 11and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Austin Collaborative 12CDC for costs associated with operational expenses in State 13fiscal year 2026 by Article 45, Section 425 of Public Act 14104-0003, as amended, or so much thereof that remains 15unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, is hereby 16appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 17Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 18Austin Collaborative CDC for costs associated with operational 19expenses. 20ARTICLE 221    Section 5. The amount of $2,410,650, or so much thereof 22that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose   SB4094- 46 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1in Article 122, Section 10 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 2is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 4grant to the Illinois Hotel and Lodging Association for all 5costs associated with workforce development and training, 6including prior years' costs. 7    Section 10. The amount of $2,186,837, or so much thereof 8that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 92026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 10in Article 122, Section 15 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 11is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 12the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 13grant to the Joliet Area Historical Museum for expenses 14associated with the restoration of the property formerly 15operated as the Joliet Correctional Center, including prior 16years' costs. 17    Section 15. The amount of $83,478, or so much thereof that 18remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 19from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 20Article 122, Section 20 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 21hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 22the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 23grant to the Safer Foundation for all costs associated with 24the women bridge construction training program, including   SB4094- 47 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1prior years' costs. 2    Section 20. The amount of $16,000, or so much thereof that 3remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 4from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 5Article 122, Section 25 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 6hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to Black Oaks Center for all costs associated with 9operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 25. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 122, Section 30 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 14is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to the City of Rock Island for all costs and operating 17expenses of the Quad Cities Regional Film Office, including 18prior years' costs. 19    Section 30. The amount of $12,269,461, or so much thereof 20that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 212026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 22in Article 122, Section 35 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 23is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to   SB4094- 48 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants 2and administrative expenses associated with public safety and 3economic development to the following named entities, in the 4approximate amounts below, including prior years' costs:5  Village of Crest Hill..............................$250,0006  Village of Plainfield..............................$250,0007  Village of Bolingbrook.............................$250,0008  Wheatland Township.................................$250,0009  Village of Oswego..................................$250,00010  City of Champaign..................................$750,00011  Niles Township Social Worker12   Respite Program...................................$250,00013  Rolling Meadows Neighborhood Resource14   Center & Social Services Program..................$500,00015  Village of Milan...................................$250,00016  Village of Roseville...............................$250,00017  Village of Hazel Crest ............................$650,00018  Village of Matteson................................$750,00019  Orland Township Highway Department.................$250,00020  Village of Orland Hills..........................$1,250,00021  Village of Frankfort...............................$600,00022  City of St. Charles................................$250,00023  City of Geneva.....................................$250,00024  City of Batavia....................................$250,00025  Village of North Aurora............................$250,00026  Village of Oswego..................................$250,000  SB4094- 49 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Village of Montgomery..............................$250,0002  City of Aurora.....................................$250,0003  City of Naperville.................................$250,0004  South Chicago Heights..............................$250,0005  Park Forest School Dist 163........................$250,0006  Rich Township......................................$250,0007  Village of Wilmington..............................$250,0008  City of Peoria.....................................$250,0009  City of Bloomington................................$250,00010  Town of Normal.....................................$250,00011  County of Peoria...................................$125,00012  Village of Bartonville.............................$125,00013  Village of West Peoria.............................$125,00014  Village of Peoria Heights..........................$125,00015  City of East Peoria................................$125,00016  City of Washington.................................$125,00017  Center for Tax and Budget Accountability...........$250,00018  Northbrook Park District...........................$250,00019  City of Park Ridge.................................$250,00020  Argo Community High School District 217..........$1,000,00021  Berwyn Township Public Health District.............$250,00022  City of Rockford...................................$500,00023  Village of Cherry Valley...........................$250,00024  City of Belvidere..................................$250,00025  Shorewood Police Department........................$250,00026  Village of Romeoville..............................$200,000  SB4094- 50 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Joliet Police Department...........................$200,0002  City of Urbana...................................$1,000,0003  City of Elmhurst...................................$850,0004  Village of Hinsdale................................$850,0005  Village of Mundelein...............................$250,0006  One Hope United Waukegan...........................$650,0007  City of North Chicago..............................$200,0008  City of Waukegan...................................$200,0009  Northeastern Illinois Regional Crime Lab.........$1,000,00010  Deerfield Police Department........................$250,00011  Lake Forest Police Department......................$250,00012  Park Ridge Police Department.......................$250,00013  Des Plaines Police Department......................$250,00014  Schaumburg Police Department.......................$250,00015  Village of Schaumburg..............................$300,00016  Village of Bridgeview..............................$500,00017  Village of North Riverside.........................$250,00018  Kates Detective and Security Academy Inc...........$450,00019  Village of Chatham.................................$400,00020  Ada S McKinley Community Services..................$562,50021  Little Village Chamber of Commerce.................$250,00022  Economic Strategies Development Corporation........$250,00023  Westside NAACP.....................................$250,00024  Life Shack.........................................$250,00025  Meet Chicago Northwest...........................$1,250,00026  Summer Music Series................................$250,000  SB4094- 51 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Englewood Chamber of Commerce....................$1,000,0002  Downtown Springfield, Inc..........................$500,0003  Moving Pillsbury Forward.........................$1,200,0004  Route History......................................$550,0005  Mount Greenwood Community and6   Business Association..............................$250,0007  Chicago 95th Street Business Association...........$250,0008  Beverly Arts Center................................$250,0009  Morgan Park Beverly Hills Business Association.....$250,00010  Positive Moves.....................................$250,00011  Black Contractors Owners and Executives............$500,00012  Whiz Kids Foundation.............................$1,000,00013  House of James.....................................$250,00014  New Mount Tabor Missionary Baptist Church..........$250,00015  Restoration Ministries.............................$250,00016  Link Further.......................................$250,00017  City of Madison....................................$250,00018  New Covenant Community Development Corporation.....$500,00019  Center for Tax and Budget Accountability...........$250,00020  Westside NAACP.....................................$250,00021  Manhattan Fire District............................$250,00022    Total                                         $35,022,575 23    Section 35. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 24that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 252026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose   SB4094- 52 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1in Article 122, Section 45 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 2is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 3the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 4grant to the Assyrian American Chamber of Commerce for costs 5associated with operating expenses, including prior years' 6costs. 7    Section 40. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 8that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 92026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 10in Article 122, Section 55 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 11is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 12the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 13grant to the Village of Lincolnwood for costs associated with 14operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 15    Section 45. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof 16that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 172026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 18in Article 122, Section 60 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 19is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 20the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 21grant to the City of Des Plaines for costs associated with the 22restaurant incentives program, including prior years' costs. 23    Section 50. The amount of $750,000, or so much thereof   SB4094- 53 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 22026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 3in Article 122, Section 70 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 4is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 5the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 6grant to the Greater Englewood Chamber of Commerce for 7operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 55. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 9that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 102026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 11in Article 122, Section 75 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 12is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 13the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 14grant to the Village of Morton Grove for the purchase of a fire 15truck, including prior years' costs. 16    Section 60. The amount of $92,453, or so much thereof that 17remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 18from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 19Article 122, Section 80 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 20hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 22grant to Rockford Area Convention Bureau for talent 23acquisition, including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 54 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 65. The amount of $226,181, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 122, Section 85 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity to provide 7unemployment insurance relief in response to the COVID-19 8pandemic to eligible small restaurants in the City of 9Rockford, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 70. The amount of $236, or so much thereof that 11remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 12from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 13Article 122, Section 90 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 14hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 15the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 16grant to Ice and Fire Mentor Program for the purpose of youth 17operations, including prior years' costs. 18    Section 75. The amount of $25,000, or so much thereof that 19remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 20from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 21Article 122, Section 95 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is 22hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 23the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 24grant to American Legion Illinois Premier Boys State for the   SB4094- 55 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1purpose of operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 2    Section 80. The amount of $20,167, or so much thereof that 3remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 4from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 5Article 122, Section 100 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 8grant to American Legion Post 52 Romeoville for the purpose of 9operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 10    Section 85. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 122, Section 110 of Public Act 104-0003, as 14amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 15Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 16for a grant to the Chicago Southland Economic Development 17Corporation for operating expenses, including prior years' 18costs. 19    Section 90. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 20that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 212026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 22in Article 122, Section 115 of Public Act 104-0003, as 23amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois'   SB4094- 56 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 2for a grant to the Village of Dolton for operating expenses, 3including prior years' costs. 4    Section 95. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof 5that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 62026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 7in Article 122, Section 130 of Public Act 104-0003, as 8amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 9Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10for a grant to the MTC Community Outreach Cooperation for 11costs associated with Phases I and II of the Community Center 12Project, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 100. The amount of $485,000, or so much thereof 14that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 152026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 16in Article 122, Section 140 of Public Act 104-0003, as 17amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 18Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 19for a grant to Rich Township for operational and 20infrastructure costs, including prior years' costs. 21    Section 105. The amount of $3,800,000, or so much thereof 22that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose   SB4094- 57 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1in Article 122, Section 150 of Public Act 104-0003, as 2amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 3Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 4for a grant to Rich Township for costs associated with capital 5improvements and operational costs, including prior years' 6costs. 7    Section 110. The amount of $639,952, or so much thereof 8that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 92026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 10in Article 122, Section 155 of Public Act 104-0003, as 11amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 12Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 13for a grant to St. Clair County for costs associated with the 14St. Clair County Demolition Program, including prior years' 15costs. 16    Section 115. The amount of $2,500,000, or so much thereof 17that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 182026, from a reappropriation made for such purpose in Article 19122, Section 160 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, is hereby 20reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 21Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to 22non-profits, units of local governments, and school districts 23for operating expenses, including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 58 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 120. The amount of $750,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 122, Section 165 of Public Act 104-0003, as 5amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 6Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to the Grand O'Hare Chamber of Commerce for 8operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 9    Section 125. The amount of $128,541, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 122, Section 170 of Public Act 104-0003, as 13amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 14Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 15for a grant to the Oak Park Arts Council for operating 16expenses, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 130. The amount of $2,352,181, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 122, Section 175 of Public Act 104-0003, as 21amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 22Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 23for a grant to the Tinley Park District costs associated with 24the remediation and cleanup of the Tinley Park Mental Health   SB4094- 59 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Center, including prior years' costs. 2    Section 135. The named amounts, or so much thereof that 3remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 4from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 5Article 122, Section 180 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 6is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 7the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity including 8prior years' costs:9OFFICE OF BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT GRANTS10  For a grant to the South Asian Chamber11   of Commerce of Illinois.............................18,05612  For a grant to Pan Asian American Center.............64,57413  For a grant to South Central 14   Community Services..................................48,49915  For a grant to Chatham Business Association.........250,00016  For a grant to Southeast Chicago 17   Chamber of Commerce................................102,20418  For a grant to Greater 19   Roseland Chamber of Commerce.......................250,00020  For a grant to Mount Greenwood Community21   and Business Association...........................250,00022  For a grant to Little Village Chamber of Commerce23   Little Village Community Foundation.................61,90124  For a grant to Village of Cahokia...................125,00025  For a grant to Illinois Central College..............57,492  SB4094- 60 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  For a grant to South Holland 2   Business Association................................62,3513  For a grant to Chamber 57 (Matteson, Richton4   Park, Homewood, Flossmoor Areas)....................27,4615  For a grant to Village of Bridgeview................250,000 6    Section 140. The sum of $200,000, or so much thereof that 7remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 8from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 9Article 122, Section 185 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 10is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 11the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 12grant to the Village of Washington Park for costs associated 13with equipment for the police and fire departments, including 14prior years' costs. 15    Section 145. The amount of $13,247, or so much thereof 16that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 172026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 18in Article 122, Section 190 of Public Act 104-0003, as 19amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 20Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 21for a grant to the Asian American Chamber of Commerce of 22Illinois, including prior years' costs. 23    Section 150. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof   SB4094- 61 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 22026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 3in Article 122, Section 200 of Public Act 104-0003, as 4amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 5Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 6for a grant to the Sunshine Cultural Arts Center for costs 7associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 8costs. 9    Section 155. The amount of $300,000, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 122, Section 205 of Public Act 104-0003, as 13amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 14Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 15for a grant to the Pearls of Power for costs associated with 16operational expenses including prior years' costs. 17    Section 160. The amount of $134,028, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 122, Section 215 of Public Act 104-0003, as 21amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 22Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 23for a grant to DREAAM Opportunity Center for the purpose of 24supporting the development, implementation, operational costs,   SB4094- 62 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1and evaluation of a state-of-the-art early childhood center 2with a focus on Black cultural education, wraparound services 3and early intervention, family mental health services, and 4culturally relevant parental engagement, including prior 5years' costs. 6    Section 165. The amount of $10,099,274, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 122, Section 220 of Public Act 104-0003, as 10amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12for grants to the following units of local government for 13community development, violence prevention and administrative 14costs, including prior years' costs:15  City of Rockford.................................$1,500,00016  City of Loves Park.................................$500,00017  City of Belvidere................................$1,000,00018  City of East Moline..............................$1,500,00019  City of Moline...................................$1,500,00020  City of Champaign................................$2,000,00021  City of Urbana...................................$2,000,00022  City of Danville.................................$1,000,00023  City of Peoria...................................$3,000,00024  City of East Peoria................................$500,00025  Village of Peoria Heights..........................$250,000  SB4094- 63 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  City of West Peoria................................$250,0002  Village of Bartonville.............................$250,0003  City of Bloomington................................$500,0004  Town of Normal.....................................$500,0005  City of Springfield..............................$3,000,0006  City of Decatur..................................$1,000,0007  City of Alton....................................$1,000,0008  City of Granite City.............................$1,000,0009  City of East St. Louis...........................$3,000,00010  City of Cahokia Heights..........................$3,000,00011  Venice Township....................................$250,00012  Village of Washington Park.........................$250,00013  Village of Brooklyn................................$250,00014  Village of Fairmont................................$250,00015  City of Cairo......................................$500,00016  City of Carbondale.................................$500,000 17    Section 170. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 18that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 192026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 20in Article 122, Section 235 of Public Act 104-0003, as 21amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 22Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 23for a grant to Village of Bridgeview for costs associated with 24Seat Geek Stadium upgrades and tourism, including prior years' 25costs.   SB4094- 64 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 175. The amount of $300,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 122, Section 240 of Public Act 104-0003, as 5amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 6Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to North Riverside for costs associated with the 8capital improvements to West Central Consolidated 9Communication Dispatch Center serving the Villages of 10Riverside, North Riverside, Brookfield and McCook, including 11prior years' costs. 12    Section 180. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 13that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 142026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 15in Article 122, Section 255 of Public Act 104-0003, as 16amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 17Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18for a grant to the Village of Bedford Park for costs associated 19with infrastructure, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 185. The amount of $980,000, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 122, Section 260 of Public Act 104-0003, as   SB4094- 65 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 2Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3for a grant to the City of Plainfield for costs associated with 4water infrastructure improvements, including prior years' 5costs. 6    Section 190. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 122, Section 265 of Public Act 104-0003, as 10amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12for a grant to the City of Niles for costs associated with a 13Salt Dome, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 195. The amount of $1,250,000, or so much thereof 15that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 162026, from reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 17Article 122, Section 270 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 18is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to the City of Lake Bluff for costs associated with a 21pedestrian bridge, including prior years' costs. 22    Section 200. The amount of $850,000, or so much thereof 23that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30,   SB4094- 66 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b12026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 2in Article 122, Section 275 of Public Act 104-0003, as 3amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 4Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 5for a grant to Kankakee County for costs associated with 6infrastructure improvements in the following units of local 7government, including prior years' costs:8  Kankakee Valley Park District......................$150,0009  Bourbonnais.........................................$50,00010  Chebanse Township...................................$50,00011  Bradley............................................$100,00012  Essex...............................................$50,00013  Pilot Township......................................$50,00014  Reddick.............................................$50,00015  South Wilmington....................................$50,00016  Braceville..........................................$50,00017  Herscher...........................................$100,00018  Union Hill.........................................$100,00019  City of Kankakee...................................$200,000 20    Section 205. The amount of $55,000, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 122, Section 285 of Public Act 104-0003, as 24amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 25Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity   SB4094- 67 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1for a grant to Hinsdale Community Services for costs 2associated with infrastructure improvements, including prior 3years' costs. 4    Section 210. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 5that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 62026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 7in Article 122, Section 295 of Public Act 104-0003, as 8amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 9Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10for a grant to the Cicero Fire Department for costs associated 11with operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 12    Section 215. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof 13that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 142026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 15in Article 122, Section 310 of Public Act 104-0003, as 16amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 17Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18for a grant to the Lyons Fire Department for costs associated 19with operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 220. The amount of $100,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 320 of Public   SB4094- 68 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 2Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity for a grant to Regional 911 Village of North 4Riverside for costs associated with operating expenses related 5to provision of regional 911 services, including prior years' 6costs. 7    Section 225. The amount of $371,594, or so much thereof 8that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 92026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 10in Article 122, Section 325 of Public Act 104-0003, as 11amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 12Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 13for a grant to the Village of Orland Hills for costs associated 14with infrastructure improvements, including prior years' 15costs. 16    Section 230. The amount of $456,889, or so much thereof 17that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 182026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 19in Article 122, Section 330 of Public Act 104-0003, as 20amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 21Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 22for a grant to the Orland Fire Protection District for costs 23associated with infrastructure improvements, including prior 24years' costs.   SB4094- 69 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 235. The amount of $225,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 4in Article 122, Section 340 of Public Act 104-0003, as 5amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 6Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for a grant to the Village of Hazel Crest for costs associated 8with infrastructure improvements, including prior years' 9costs. 10    Section 240. The amount of $28,203, or so much thereof 11that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 122026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 13in Article 122, Section 355 of Public Act 104-0003, as 14amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 15Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 16for a grant to the Illinois Retail Merchants Association for 17creating and operating an organized retail crime association 18to combat organized retail crime, including prior years' 19costs. 20    Section 245. The sum of $73,334, or so much thereof that 21remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 22from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 23Article 122, Section 360 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended,   SB4094- 70 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 2the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 3grant to the Village of Washington Park for costs associated 4with equipment for the police and fire departments, including 5the purchase of property and/or infrastructure improvements 6necessary for constructing a new fire station/public safety 7building, including prior years' costs. 8    Section 250. The amount of $93,000, or so much thereof 9that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 102026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 11in Article 122, Section 365 of Public Act 104-0003, as 12amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 13Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 14for a grant to the Austin Fresh Market for operating expenses, 15including prior years' costs. 16    Section 255. The amount of $1,754, or so much thereof that 17remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 18from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 19Article 122, Section 370 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 20is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 21the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 22grant to the North Austin Council for operating expenses, 23including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 71 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 260. The amount of $50,000, or so much thereof 2that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 32026, from reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 4Article 122, Section 375 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 5is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 6the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 7grant to Good Samaritan House for operating expenses, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 265. The amount of $13,342,078, or so much thereof 10that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 112026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 12in Article 122, Section 380 of Public Act 104-0003, as 13amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 14Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 15for grants to the following named entities including 16non-profits and units of local government for violence 17interruption, community development and operational expenses 18and administrative costs including prior years' costs.19Each grant shall equal the approximate amounts below:20  United Way of St Louis.............................$500,00021  Greater Auburn Gresham CDC.........................$450,00022  Urban Growers Collective ..........................$150,00023  Demoiselle 2 Femme, NFP............................$150,00024  Target Area Development............................$150,00025  Kindness Campaign..................................$150,000  SB4094- 72 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  RAGE (Resident Association of Greater Englewood....$350,0002  Englewood First Responders.........................$150,0003  A Knock At Midnight................................$250,0004  Teamwork Englewood.................................$350,0005  Public Equity......................................$150,0006  GoodKidsMadCity-Englewood..........................$250,0007  TGI Movement.......................................$150,0008  Ex-Cons for Community Social Change................$250,0009  Stay Lit Youth Services............................$150,00010  Teatro Tariakuri Dance and Theatre.................$150,00011  Community Youth Development Institute (CYDI).......$250,00012  Inner-City Muslim Action Network (IMAN)............$150,00013  Woodlawn Restorative Justice Hub...................$150,00014  Precious Blood Ministry of Reconciliation..........$150,00015  Southside Together Organizing for Power (STOP).....$250,00016  LaTanya & The Youth of Englewood...................$150,00017  Grow Greater Englewood.............................$150,00018  Teamwork Englewood.................................$150,00019  Greater Englewood CDC..............................$150,00020  Le Penseur Youth & Family Services.................$150,00021  Purpose Over Pain..................................$150,00022  Bounce for Joy Project.............................$150,00023  Project Simeon 2000................................$150,00024  Gresham Community Center...........................$150,00025  House of James...................................$1,000,00026  Outreach Christian Community Development Corp....$1,000,000  SB4094- 73 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Christian Community Health Center................$1,000,0002  Positive Moves NFP...............................$1,000,0003  After The Game Inc...............................$1,000,0004  Ada S. McKinley..................................$5,000,0005  The African American Museum at the England Manor...$200,0006  Black Chamber of Commerce of Lake County...........$200,0007  Lake County Chamber of Commerce....................$200,0008  Cory Douglas Scholastic Academy....................$250,0009  Lions Math & Science Christian Academy.............$250,00010  Westside Community Center, Inc.....................$200,00011  Step by Step Daycare...............................$400,00012  Christopher D. Redding Youth Asthma Foundation.....$400,00013  GiveNKind..........................................$500,00014  Waukegan Park District.............................$350,00015  Foss Park District.................................$350,00016  Mundelein Park District............................$350,00017  Vista Medical Center East in Waukegan..............$650,00018  Brushwood Center at Ryerson Woods..................$700,00019  Hyde Park Neighborhood Club........................$250,00020  South Shore Chamber................................$250,00021  Quad Communities Development Corp..................$250,00022  DuSable Museum.....................................$700,00023  Rogers Park Business Alliance......................$500,00024  Andersonville Chamber of Commerce..................$500,00025  Uptown United......................................$500,00026  Lincoln Square Ravenswood Chamber of Commerce......$500,000  SB4094- 74 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Edgewater Chamber of Commerce......................$500,0002  A Just Harvest.....................................$500,0003  Heartland Health Centers...........................$500,0004  Family Matters.....................................$125,0005  Chinese Mutual Aid Association.....................$125,0006  Black Ensemble Theater.............................$125,0007  Youth Guidance.....................................$125,0008  Ethiopian Community Association....................$250,0009  Refugee One........................................$250,00010  Ethiopian Community Association....................$250,00011  African American History Museum....................$275,00012  Decatur Boys & Girls Club..........................$350,00013  Compass for Kids...................................$150,00014  Decatur Pastors Coalition..........................$100,00015  Sangamon County.....................................$25,00016  Springfield Urban League...........................$500,00017  Springfield ICON...................................$150,00018  Metro Black Chamber of Commerce....................$200,00019  Springfield Project................................$200,00020  Fifth Street Renaissance.........................$1,500,00021  Downtown Springfield Inc...........................$300,00022  The LYNC...........................................$100,00023  Greater All Nations Tabernacle.....................$550,00024  Pure Haven Family Resource Center..................$200,00025  Mount Pilgrim Development Corp.....................$500,00026  People's Community Development Association.........$500,000  SB4094- 75 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Greater Rock Development Corp......................$500,0002  Acclivus Inc.......................................$250,0003  Westside Health Authority..........................$500,0004  Boxing Out Negativity..............................$350,0005  Cottage Grove Heights Community Coalition...........$50,0006  Global Girls Inc....................................$50,0007  Majestic Florist....................................$50,0008  True to Life Foundation............................$100,0009  Rosemoor Community Association.....................$100,00010  West Chesterfield Community Association............$100,00011  Dolton School District #149........................$150,00012  Greater Roseland Chamber of Commerce...............$250,00013  Thornton Township..................................$500,00014  Chatham Business Association.......................$750,00015  Southeast Chicago Chamber of Commerce..............$750,00016  South Central Community Service....................$750,00017  Xi Lambda Education Foundation.....................$150,00018  Mu Delta Lambda Charitable Foundation..............$250,00019  IDEAL Educational Foundation.......................$100,00020  AKArama Foundation Inc.............................$100,00021  Yellow Tea Rose Foundation.........................$100,00022  D'ESTEE Inc........................................$100,00023  Monarch Awards Foundation Inc......................$100,00024  Alpha Kappa Alpha - Phi Epsilon Omega Chapter......$100,00025  Treatment Alternatives for Safe Communities......$2,000,00026  Champs Male Mentoring Program - Chirise............$100,000  SB4094- 76 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  South Technical Center..............................$50,000 2    Section 270. The amount of $5,975,000, or so much thereof 3that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 42026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 5in Article 122, Section 385 of Public Act 104-0003, as 6amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 7Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 8for grants to non-profits and units of local government for 9violence interruption, community development, and operational 10expenses, including prior years' costs. 11    Section 275. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 12that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 132026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 14in Article 122, Section 390 of Public Act 104-0003, as 15amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 16Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 17for a grant to Reclaiming Chicago for costs associated with 18purchasing and installing solar panels in Lawndale, including 19prior years' costs. 20    Section 280. The amount of $360,000, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 122, Section 395 of Public Act 104-0003, as   SB4094- 77 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 2Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3for a grant to St. Joseph Academy for all costs associated with 4repairs, maintenance, and other capital improvements, as well 5as operations and services, including prior years' costs. 6    Section 285. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 122, Section 415 of Public Act 104-0003, as 10amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12for a grant to the Village of Bridgeview for costs associated 13with promotional expenses, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 290. The amount of $23,042,578, or so much thereof 15that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 162026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 17in Article 122, Section 435 of Public Act 104-0003, as 18amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 19Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 20for administrative costs and grants associated with public 21safety, recreational development, and economic development to 22the following named entities, in the approximate amounts 23below:24  Community Foundation of Northern Illinois...........500,000  SB4094- 78 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Carl R. Woese Institute for Genomic Biology2   at the University of Urbana-Champaign..............500,0003  United Way of Will County...........................500,0004  Plainfield Township.................................500,0005  Hoffman Estates Park District.......................500,0006  Mentoring Youth Through Technology..................500,0007  Village of Steger...................................500,0008  Flowers Fitness.....................................500,0009  Evanston Community Foundation.......................500,00010  Oak Lawn Regional Emergency Communications Center...500,00011  Starved Rock Community Foundation...................500,00012  Chicago Park District...............................500,00013  APS Training Institute..............................500,00014  St. Clair County15   Intergovernmental Grants Department................500,00016  Village of Northbrook...............................500,00017  39th Ward Mayfair Library...........................500,00018  Community Foundation of the Fox River Valley........500,00019  Village of Elmhurst.................................500,00020  Little City Foundation..............................500,00021  Village of Shorewood................................500,00022  Maywood Park District...............................500,00023  Welles (Gideon) Park................................500,00024  City of Decatur.....................................500,00025  Chicago Park District for Ogden Park................500,00026  Youth Conservation Corps (YCC)......................500,000  SB4094- 79 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  City of Country Club Hills..........................500,0002  Des Plaines Police Department.......................500,0003  Brighton Park Neighborhood Council..................500,0004  Chicago Park District...............................500,0005  Rogers Park Business Alliance.......................500,0006  Illinois Prison Project.............................500,0007  United Way of Will County...........................500,0008  Village of Evergreen Park...........................500,0009  North Berwyn Park District..........................500,00010  Life Impactors Foundation...........................500,00011  Northeast DuPage Special Recreation Association.....500,00012  Calumet City Library................................500,00013  William Rainey Harper College.......................500,00014  Blue Island Park District...........................500,00015  Senior, Student, and Teacher STEM Hub...............500,00016  Peoria Park District................................500,00017  Coalition for a Better Chinese American Community...280,00018  NeighborSpace.......................................220,00019  Ada S. McKinley Community Services..................500,000 20    Section 295. The amount of $19,809,627, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purposes 23in Article 122, Section 440 of Public Act 104-0003, as 24amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 25Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity   SB4094- 80 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1for administrative costs and grants associated with public 2safety and economic development to the following named 3entities, in the approximate amounts below:4  Mckinley Park Development Council...................250,0005  Glenwood Academy....................................250,0006  Lake County Sheriff's Office........................250,0007  Naperville Community Television (NCTV17)............250,0008  City of Urbana......................................250,0009  Habitat for Humanity of Champaign County............250,00010  Champaign County Regional Planning Commission.......250,00011  Village of Western Springs..........................350,00012  Village of Hinsdale.................................375,00013  DuPage County Animal Shelter........................275,00014  City of Rock Island.................................100,00015  Western Illinois University.........................500,00016  Galesburg, Museums, Inc.............................200,00017  The Alexandria Foundation...........................200,00018  Acclivus............................................200,00019  Harvey Small fry Wildcats...........................400,00020  Harvey Small fry Wildcats...........................200,00021  The House Of James..................................200,00022  Village of New Lenox................................250,00023  City of Country Club Hills..........................250,00024  Village of Orland Hills.............................250,00025  Village of Richton Park.............................250,00026  Kane County States Atty...........................1,000,000  SB4094- 81 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Lake County Sheriff's Office........................250,0002  Greater Waukegan Development Coalition (GWDC).......250,0003  TRECC Community Development Foundation..............200,0004  FBRK Brands.........................................200,0005  Reach Community Development Corporation.............200,0006  Neighborhood Heros..................................200,0007  West Point School of Music..........................200,0008  Chicago Heights.....................................250,0009  Park Forest.........................................250,00010  Manhattan Park District.............................250,00011  Wilton Township.....................................250,00012  Joliet Historical Museum............................250,00013  Fountaindale Public Library.........................250,00014  Village of Cresthill Police Department..............250,00015  Plainfield Township.................................250,00016  Old Irving Park Association.........................250,00017  School District 63..................................250,00018  Village of La Grange..............................1,000,00019  United Way of Rock River Valley.....................300,00020  United Way of Rock River Valley.....................700,00021  Mechanista..........................................250,00022  School Distirct 186.................................250,00023  Route History.......................................250,00024  Laborers Disaster Response Team.....................250,00025  Southwest Suburban Immigrant Project................250,00026  DuPage Township Center Food Pantry..................250,000  SB4094- 82 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  South Asian American Chamber of Commerce............250,0002  Village of Arlington Heights........................250,0003  Township of Proviso.................................500,0004  New Landmark Community Development Corp.............500,0005  Freedom Land Community Partners, Inc................500,0006  Habilitative Systems................................400,0007  The Answer Inc......................................500,0008  True To Life Foundation.............................250,0009  Rosemoor Community Association......................100,00010  West Chesterfield Community Association.............250,00011  Hegewisch Business Association......................250,00012  Chatham Business Association........................250,00013  Southeast Chicago Chamber of Commerce...............250,00014  Mu Delta Lambda Charitable Foundation...............250,00015  AKArama Foundation Inc..............................100,00016  D'ESTEE INC.........................................100,00017  Calumet Area Industrial Commission..................100,00018  District Outreach Initiatives.......................500,00019  Moving our Youth Ahead..............................150,00020  Chicago Park District - West Chatham................250,00021  Lake Effect Community Development...................250,00022  TCA Health..........................................250,00023  West Chatham Improvement Association................100,00024  Chesterfield Community Council......................150,00025  South Deering.......................................100,00026  Chicago Park District - Tuley Park..................250,000  SB4094- 83 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  Chicago Park District - Avalon Park.................250,0002  Prevention Partnership..............................100,0003  Illinois Association of Infant Mental Health........260,0004  Austin Childcare Providers Network..................300,0005  Oak Park and River Forest Infant Welfare Society....400,0006  New Moms............................................500,0007  Sarah's Inn.........................................250,0008  Beyond Hunger.......................................500,0009  Housing Forward.....................................500,00010  West Cook YMCA......................................200,00011  Wonder Works Museum.................................100,00012  Hephzibah Children's Association....................500,00013  New Life Centers....................................750,00014  Mujeres Latinas en Accion...........................250,00015  Howard Brown Health.................................300,00016  Florence Heller JCC.................................150,00017  City of Springfield...............................1,300,00018  Lawndale Christian Legal Center...................1,500,00019  Chicago Architecture Biennial.......................150,00020  Garfield Park Conservatory Alliance.................200,00021  AllenForce..........................................300,00022  League of Chicago Theaters..........................500,00023  Trilogy.............................................500,00024  Bensenville Community Public Library................200,00025  River Grove Public Library District.................200,00026  AAR Rockford......................................1,500,000  SB4094- 84 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1  SkillsUSA Illinois................................1,000,0002  Village of Bellwood.................................375,0003  SD 89 Education Foundation..........................375,0004  Aurora Regional Hispanic Chamber....................250,0005  Small Business Development Center of Aurora.........250,0006  Joliet Latino Economic Development Association......250,0007  Economic Strategy Development Corporation...........250,0008  Little Village Chamber of Commerce..................250,0009  Puerto Rican Cultural Center........................250,00010  Albany Park/North River Commission..................250,00011  Belmont Central Chamber.............................250,00012  Northwest Community Development Center..............250,00013  Logan Square Chamber of Commerce....................250,00014  Wicker Park Chamber of Commerce.....................250,00015  Melrose Park Chamber of Commerce....................150,00016  Northwest Hispanic Chamber of Commerce..............150,00017  Greater Southwest Development Corporation...........200,00018  Midway Chamber of Commerce..........................250,00019  Illinois Resource Center..........................1,000,00020  Latino Worker Safety Center.........................500,000 21    Section 300. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof 22that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 232026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 24in Article 122, Section 445 of Public Act 104-0003, as 25amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois'   SB4094- 85 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 2for a grant to the City of Granite City for costs associated 3with contingent and operational expenses. 4    Section 305. The sum of $388,501, or so much thereof that 5remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 6from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 7Article 122, Section 450 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 8is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 9the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 10grant to the City of Collinsville for costs associated with 11contingent and operational expenses. 12    Section 310. The sum of $30,110, or so much thereof that 13remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 14from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 15Article 122, Section 455 of Public Act 104-003, as amended, is 16hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 17the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 18grant to the Edwardsville Art Center for costs associated with 19contingent and operational expenses. 20    Section 315. The sum of $1,132,610, or so much thereof 21that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 222026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 23in Article 122, Section 460 of Public Act 104-0003, as   SB4094- 86 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 2Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 3for a grant to the DuSable Black History Museum and Education 4Center for costs associated with contingent and operational 5expenses. 6    Section 320. The sum of $1,038,298, or so much thereof 7that remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 82026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose 9in Article 122, Section 465 of Public Act 104-0003, as 10amended, is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 11Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12for a grant to Itasca for costs associated with the Coalition 13to Stop CPKC. 14    Section 325. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof that 15remains unexpended at the close of business on June 30, 2026, 16from a reappropriation heretofore made for such purpose in 17Article 122, Section 470 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, 18is hereby reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 19the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a 20grant to Quad City Regional Development Film Office for costs 21associated with contingent and ordinary expenses. 22    Section 330. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 23as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of   SB4094- 87 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 2made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 475 of Public 3Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 4Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity for a grant to the Village of Lynwood for costs 6associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 7costs. 8    Section 335. The amount of $1,700,000, or so much thereof 9as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 11made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 476 of Public 12Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 13Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 14Opportunity for a grant to the South Suburban College 15Foundation for costs associated with operational expenses, 16including prior years' costs. 17    Section 340. The amount of $1,700,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 19business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 20made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 477 of Public 21Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 22Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity for a grant to Governors State University 24Foundation for costs associated with operational expenses,   SB4094- 88 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1including prior years' costs. 2    Section 345. The amount of $1,700,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 4business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 5made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 478 of Public 6Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 7Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity for a grant to the Calumet City Public Library for 9costs associated with operational expenses, including prior 10years' costs. 11    Section 350. The amount of $1,700,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 13business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 14made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 479 of Public 15Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 16Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 17Opportunity for a grant to the Community Foundation of 18Northern Illinois for costs associated with operational 19expenses, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 355. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 23made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 480 of Public   SB4094- 89 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 2Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 3Opportunity for a grant to the Maywood Fine Arts Association 4for costs associated with operational expenses, including 5prior years' costs. 6    Section 365. The amount of $250,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 9made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 482 of Public 10Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 11Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity for a grant to The Way Back Inn Inc for costs 13associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 14costs. 15    Section 370. The amount of $1,200,000, or so much thereof 16as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 17business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 18made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 483 of Public 19Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 20Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 21Opportunity for a grant to Shelter Inc for costs associated 22with operational expenses, including prior years' costs. 23    Section 375. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof   SB4094- 90 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 2business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 3made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 484 of Public 4Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 5Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity for a grant to the Far South Community Development 7Corporation for costs associated with operational expenses, 8including prior years' costs. 9    Section 380. The amount of $1,700,000, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 12made for such purposes in Article 122, Section 485 of Public 13Act 104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 14Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity for a grant to Illinois Central College for costs 16associated with operational expenses, including prior years' 17costs. 18    Section 385. The sum of $750,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 20on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made for 21such purposes in Article 122, Section 1340 of Public Act 22104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 23Illinois' Future to the Department of Economic Opportunity for 24a grant to Urbana-Champaign Independent Media Center for costs   SB4094- 91 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1associated with violence prevention programs and operational 2expenses. 3    Section 390. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary is appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 5Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 6for grant to the City of Zion for costs associated with 7violence prevention programs, youth employment programs, and 8operational expenses. 9    Section 395. The amount of $2,000,000, that was 10appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Department 11of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to Chicago 12Metropolitan Agency for Planning for costs associated with 13operational expenses in State fiscal year 2026 by Article 55, 14Section 415 of Public Act 104-0003, as amended, or so much 15thereof that remains unexpended at the close of business on 16June 30, 2026, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for 17Illinois' Future to the Department of Commerce and Economic 18Opportunity for a grant to Chicago Metropolitan Agency for 19Planning for costs associated with operational expenses. 20ARTICLE 321    Section 5. The amount of $5,205,168, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of   SB4094- 92 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 2made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 10, of Public Act 3104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 4Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 5Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 6contracts, and operational costs associated with the Tourism 7Attraction Development Grant Program Pursuant to 20 ILCS 8665/8a(2). 9    Section 10. The amount of $21,855,068, or so much thereof 10as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 12made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 15 of Public Act 13104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 14Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 15Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 16contracts, and operational costs associated with the 17development and implementation of Job Training and Workforce 18Recovery programs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-415, including 19costs related to the implementation of equity and access 20workforce commission recommendations. 21    Section 15. The sum of $20,109,116, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 23business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 24made from such purpose in Article 123, Section 25 of Public Act   SB4094- 93 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1104-0003, as amended is reappropriated to the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the State Coronavirus 3Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund for grants, awards, and 4contingent costs associated with implementing the Research in 5Illinois to Spur Economic Recovery (RISE) program. 6    Section 20. The sum of $18,735,128, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 8business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 9made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 30 of Public Act 10104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 11Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 12Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 13purpose of making grants, contracts, and loans under the 14American Rescue Plan Capital Assets (ARPCAP) Program, 15including prior years' costs. 16    Section 25. The sum of $172,651, or so much thereof as may 17be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 18on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made for 19such purpose in Article 123, Section 35 of Public Act 20104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 21Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 22Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 23the Katherine Dunham Museum in East St. Louis, including but 24not limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the   SB4094- 94 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 2including prior years' costs. 3    Section 30. The sum of $255,000, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 5on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore made from 6such purpose in Article 123, Section 40 of Public Act 7104-0003, as amended is reappropriated from the State 8Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 9Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 10the House of Miles Davis Museum in East St. Louis, including 11but not limited to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of 12the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal 13guidance, including prior years' costs. 14    Section 50. The sum of $1,018,669, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 16business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 17made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 65 of Public Act 18104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 19Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 21Lake Effect Community Development, including but not limited 22to, for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American 23Rescue Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, 24including prior years' costs.   SB4094- 95 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1    Section 55. The sum of $190,597, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of business 3on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore made for 4such purpose in Article 123, Section 70 of Public Act 5104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 6Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 7Department Of Commerce And Economic Opportunity for a grant to 8the Peoria Chamber of Commerce, including but not limited to, 9for purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue 10Plan Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 11years' costs. 12    Section 60. The sum of $5,340,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 15made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 75 of Public Act 16104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 17Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 18Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for a grant to 19the City of Cahokia Heights, including but not limited to, for 20purposes permitted by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 21Act of 2021 and related federal guidance, including prior 22years' costs. 23    Section 65. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as   SB4094- 96 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 2business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 3made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 80 of Public Act 4104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 5Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 6Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants to 7support state-designated cultural districts as defined by 8Public Act 102-0628, including but not limited to, for 9purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 10Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 11prior years' costs. 12    Section 70. The sum of $19,927,363, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 14business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore 15made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 85 of Public Act 16104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 17Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 18Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the 19purpose of making grants, contracts, and loans under the 20American Rescue Plan Capital Assets (ARPCAP) Program, 21including prior years' costs. 22    Section 75. The sum of $4,215,089, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 24business on June 30, 2026, from a reappropriation heretofore   SB4094- 97 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 90 of Public Act 2104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 3Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 4Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for grants, 5contracts, and operational costs associated with the 6development and implementation of Job Training and Workforce 7Recovery programs pursuant to 20 ILCS 605/605-415, including 8prior years' costs. 9    Section 80. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 12made for such purpose in Article 123, Section 95 of Public Act 13104-0003, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 14Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund to the 15Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for ordinary 16and contingent expenses of Carter Temple Community Development 17Corporation, including but not limited to, for purposes 18allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 19and any associated federal guidance, including prior years' 20costs. 21    Section 85. The amount of $3,600,000, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of 23Commerce and Economic Opportunity from the State Coronavirus 24Urgent Remediation Emergency Fund for the awarding of grants   SB4094- 98 -OMB104 00175 CMA 10175 b1to provide technical assistance, grant support services, and 2outreach. 3    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42026.